Utah statutes.
62A-15-647.   Severability.

If any one or more provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this part, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is found to be unconstitutional the same is hereby declared to be severable and the balance of this part shall remain effective notwithstanding that unconstitutionality.  The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this part, and each provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase, or word be declared unconstitutional.

